Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.124

On-site revocation hearing—Attorney general's recommendations—Procedural rules.

At all on-site parole revocation hearings for offenders convicted of crimes committed before July 1, 1984, the community corrections officers of the department of corrections, having made the allegations of the violations of the conditions of parole, may be represented by the attorney general. The attorney general may make independent recommendations to the board about whether the violations constitute sufficient cause for the revocation of the parole and the return of the parolee to a state correctional institution for convicted felons. The hearings shall be open to the public unless the board for specifically stated reasons closes the hearing in whole or in part. The hearings shall be recorded either manually or by a mechanical recording device. An alleged parole violator may be requested to testify and any such testimony shall not be used against him or her in any criminal prosecution. The board shall adopt rules governing the formal and informal procedures authorized by this chapter and make rules of practice before the board in on-site parole revocation hearings, together with forms and instructions.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 337; 1999 c 143 s 25; 1983 c 196 s 2; 1981 c 136 s 39; 1979 c 141 s 4; 1969 c 98 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.

Severability—Effective date—1969 c 98: See notes following RCW 9.95.120.